lexc/noun/enhumelyae.lexc
!!!enhuoa.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§VV§ §uue2§ §AE21§
§UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§ §OEOE22§ §oooe2§ §oeoez22§
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§  §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoez17§
§OEOE17§ §EOA17§ §ooez18§ §JPnull§ §Jnull§ §JPJ§ §JJ§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounja
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possja;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possja
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Noun
Haitsch AddNoun;
Jóny AddNoun;
Kacziány AddNoun;
Kisnamény AddNoun;
Kubitsch AddNoun;
Pamlény AddNoun;
Patrubány AddNoun;
Vásárosnamény AddNoun;
ablakrostély AddNoun;
adagolórostély AddNoun;
adalék AddNounja;
adójárulék AddNounja;
agyagboríték AddNounja;
agyváladék AddNounja;
ajtóragaszték AddNoun;
akkumulátorszármazék AddNounja;
alaprostély AddNoun;
alibitáplálék AddNounja;
alváshátralék AddNounja;
anyagválaszték AddNoun;
apríték AddNounja;
arcrostély AddNoun;
asszonyfortély AddNoun;
aszfaltadalék AddNounja;
bankjutalék AddNounja;
benzintartalék AddNounja;
billenőnyomaték AddNounja;
bognárkastély AddNoun;
bojkottszándék AddNounja;
bolygatórostély AddNoun;
borbély AddNoun;
bordély AddNoun;
boríték AddNounja;
boszorkányfortély AddNoun;
bukórostély AddNoun;
bányajáradék AddNoun;
bányanyiladék AddNounja;
bérhátralék AddNounja;
börtönborbély AddNoun;
börtönkartoték AddNounja;
cellafolyadék AddNounja;
citrompótlék AddNounja;
csapadékárnyék AddNounja;
csatolóválaszték AddNoun;
csendtartalék AddNounja;
csigafolyadék AddNounja;
csodafolyadék AddNounja;
csodakastély AddNoun;
csoportszándék AddNounja;
cukorpótlék AddNounja;
céltáplálék AddNounja;
dimenziószakadék AddNounja;
dohánymorzsalék AddNounja;
drótrostély AddNoun;
dugványtámaszték AddNounja;
dúsítófolyadék AddNounja;
elektronhasíték AddNounja;
emberpótlék AddNounja;
endorfintartalék AddNounja;
energiakarabély AddNoun;
enzimadalék AddNounja;
erőjárulék AddNounja;
eszménypótlék AddNounja;
esőárnyék AddNoun;
ezredborbély AddNoun;
ezredszázalék AddNounja;
ezüstrostély AddNoun;
faapríték AddNoun;
fahasíték AddNounja;
farostély AddNoun;
fartoldalék AddNounja;
faválaszték AddNoun;
fehérjeszázalék AddNounja;
fenotípusszázalék AddNounja;
filmtartalék AddNounja;
fiúbordély AddNoun;
fogkrémadalék AddNounja;
folyóhordalék AddNounja;
forgórostély AddNoun;
forráshasadék AddNounja;
fortély AddNoun;
frakciótartalék AddNounja;
fustély AddNoun;
fékfolyadék AddNounja;
fémmaradék AddNounja;
férfiárnyék AddNounja;
földjáradék AddNounja;
fúvatóadalék AddNounja;
főbiztosíték AddNounja;
főkastély AddNoun;
fűtésrostély AddNoun;
fűtőfolyadék AddNounja;
gerendarostély AddNoun;
gerincfolyadék AddNounja;
gleccserszakadék AddNounja;
gombafonadék AddNounja;
grillezőrostély AddNoun;
gulyáshajlék AddNounja;
gyerekpótlék AddNounja;
gyermekbordély AddNoun;
gyorsborbély AddNoun;
gyármoslék AddNounja;
gyökérváladék AddNounja;
gyűrűszármazék AddNounja;
gépkarabély AddNoun;
géppisztolykarabély AddNoun;
géppuskairányzék AddNoun;
habarcsadalék AddNounja;
hadfortély AddNoun;
hadifortély AddNoun;
hajválaszték AddNounja;
halvagdalék AddNounja;
halászfortély AddNoun;
hamurostély AddNoun;
hangyahajlék AddNounja;
harmonikajáték AddNounja;
haséhúsvagdalék AddNounja;
hazárdjáték AddNounja;
hengerrostély AddNoun;
hibaszázalék AddNounja;
hiteltartalék AddNounja;
hormonadalék AddNounja;
hullámtajték AddNounja;
hullórostély AddNoun;
huszárkarabély AddNoun;
hálófonadék AddNounja;
háttéradalék AddNounja;
hívófolyadék AddNounja;
húgysavszármazék AddNounja;
hőárnyék AddNounja;
hűtőrostély AddNoun;
igazságnyomaték AddNounja;
ikerkastély AddNoun;
impulzuskarabély AddNoun;
indafonadék AddNounja;
inkasszójutalék AddNounja;
irányzék AddNounja;
ismétlőkarabély AddNoun;
ivófolyadék AddNounja;
jobbágyhagyaték AddNounja;
jutalék AddNounja;
játékfortély AddNoun;
játékkastély AddNoun;
jégkárszázalék AddNounja;
kagylótáplálék AddNounja;
kalózivadék AddNoun;
kamatjárulék AddNounja;
kandallórostély AddNoun;
kapurostély AddNoun;
karabély AddNoun;
karszthasadék AddNounja;
kartársiasság AddNoun;
kastély AddNoun;
katonaborbély AddNoun;
kecsegeivadék AddNounja;
kereskedőivadék AddNounja;
ketonszármazék AddNounja;
klórmaradék AddNounja;
kolbászmaradék AddNounja;
konyhafortély AddNoun;
konzerválófolyadék AddNounja;
kordély AddNoun;
kottahagyaték AddNounja;
krimikastély AddNoun;
kristályrostély AddNoun;
kutyabordély AddNoun;
kutyakastély AddNoun;
kutyapótlék AddNounja;
kvártély AddNoun;
káderivadék AddNounja;
kályharostély AddNoun;
kárászivadék AddNounja;
kénszármazék AddNounja;
készpénzjárulék AddNounja;
kézművesfortély AddNoun;
kísértetkastély AddNoun;
költséghátralék AddNounja;
körömvagdalék AddNounja;
közteherhátralék AddNounja;
kőhordalék AddNounja;
kőkastély AddNoun;
kőzetmálladék AddNounja;
lakáspótlék AddNounja;
lakókastély AddNoun;
lefolyórostély AddNoun;
levegőrostély AddNoun;
levélvagdalék AddNounja;
luxusbordély AddNoun;
láncrostély AddNoun;
látványnyomaték AddNounja;
lécrostély AddNoun;
légrostély AddNoun;
légzőrostély AddNoun;
lépcsőrostély AddNoun;
lézerkarabély AddNoun;
lórostély AddNoun;
lövegirányzék AddNounja;
majomivadék AddNounja;
melegtartalék AddNounja;
minikarabély AddNoun;
mintazáradék AddNounja;
moszattáplálék AddNounja;
mozgóbordély AddNoun;
mozgórostély AddNoun;
mulatókastély AddNoun;
munkáshajlék AddNounja;
mérföldkastély AddNoun;
mérőfolyadék AddNounja;
műemlékkastély AddNoun;
műokádék AddNounja;
nemesgázszármazék AddNounja;
nyaralókastély AddNoun;
nyelvpótlék AddNoun;
nyersanyagtartalék AddNounja;
nyáltajték AddNounja;
növényfonadék AddNounja;
olimpiapótlék AddNounja;
orvosságfolyadék AddNounja;
panelhasadék AddNounja;
papírkastély AddNoun;
patakhordalék AddNounja;
petróleumtartalék AddNounja;
pihenőkastély AddNoun;
piparostély AddNoun;
plazmakarabély AddNoun;
polimeradalék AddNounja;
posztzagyvalék AddNounja;
pulzuskarabély AddNoun;
párolófolyadék AddNounja;
pótlék AddNounja;
rekordosztalék AddNounja;
rendőrkastély AddNoun;
repülőkastély AddNoun;
rohamgépkarabély AddNoun;
rohamkarabély AddNoun;
romkastély AddNoun;
rongyszőnyegtoldalék AddNounja;
rostély AddNoun;
rumkastély AddNoun;
rémkastély AddNoun;
rémületkastély AddNoun;
részbizonyíték AddNounja;
részecskekarabély AddNoun;
rézrostély AddNoun;
sajátvektorjárulék AddNounja;
sebészborbély AddNoun;
segédborbély AddNoun;
sejtszármazék AddNounja;
selyemrostély AddNoun;
sisakrostély AddNoun;
sodronyrostély AddNoun;
sordély AddNoun;
sportfolyadék AddNounja;
szappanadalék AddNounja;
szellemkastély AddNoun;
szellőzőrostély AddNoun;
szemrostély AddNoun;
szeméttáplálék AddNounja;
szerzeteskastély AddNoun;
szigetelőmaradék AddNounja;
sziklakastély AddNoun;
szomorújáték AddNounja;
számlazáradék AddNounja;
szárítórostély AddNoun;
századborbély AddNoun;
szénhidrátszármazék AddNounja;
széntartórostély AddNoun;
szépségfortély AddNoun;
szójáték AddNounja;
szükségtáplálék AddNounja;
sárkánykastély AddNoun;
síkrostély AddNoun;
sómaradék AddNounja;
sötétítőrostély AddNoun;
sütőrostély AddNoun;
takarmánytartalék AddNounja;
taxiskastély AddNoun;
tejfolyadék AddNounja;
templomkastély AddNoun;
tenderboríték AddNounja;
tengerészbordély AddNoun;
termálkastély AddNoun;
termékválaszték AddNoun;
testpótlék AddNounja;
tisztítófolyadék AddNounja;
tudásszakadék AddNoun;
tájszószármazék AddNounja;
táplálórostély AddNoun;
társpótlék AddNounja;
többlettáplálék AddNounja;
tüdőárnyék AddNounja;
tündérkastély AddNoun;
tűzhelyrostély AddNoun;
tűzrostély AddNoun;
ujjhasíték AddNounja;
vadászkastély AddNoun;
vajsavszármazék AddNounja;
varázskastély AddNoun;
vasrostély AddNoun;
vegyszermaradék AddNounja;
vitaminadalék AddNounja;
választék AddNounja;
vámbiztosíték AddNoun;
vándorborbély AddNoun;
vándorrostély AddNoun;
várkastély AddNoun;
városkastély AddNoun;
védőrostély AddNoun;
védőárnyék AddNounja;
vízhordalék AddNounja;
vízikastély AddNoun;
zebrakastély AddNoun;
zenekastély AddNoun;
zsírpótlék AddNounja;
álltámaszték AddNounja;
átlaghozadék AddNounja;
ávósborbély AddNoun;
életkedvtartalék AddNounja;
éterszármazék AddNounja;
óvadék AddNounja;
ördögkastély AddNoun;
üstmaradék AddNounja;
üvegkastély AddNoun;
űrkastély AddNoun;
